Washington statutes.
RCW 7.75.060

Withdrawal from dispute resolution process.

Any person who voluntarily enters a dispute resolution process at a center established under this chapter may revoke his or her consent, withdraw from dispute resolution, and seek judicial or administrative redress prior to reaching a written resolution agreement. The withdrawal shall be in writing. No legal penalty, sanction, or restraint may be imposed upon the person.

[ 1984 c 258 s 506.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.